Washington statutes.
RCW 18.215.040

Secretary's authority.

In addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary has the authority to:

(1) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as required to implement this chapter;

(2) Establish all registration and renewal fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.250;

(3) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this chapter;

(4) Register an applicant or deny registration based upon unprofessional conduct or impairment governed by the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW;

(5) Hire clerical, administrative, investigative, and other staff as needed to implement this chapter; and

(6) Maintain the official department record of all applicants and persons with registrations.

[ 1999 c 335 s 5.]